Tennessee, session 114, SB0777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-116, is amended by deleting the
language "not to exceed three (3) weeks" in subsection (a) and substituting instead "not to
exceed two (2) weeks".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0777
002780
- 1 -